California statutes. Military and Veterans Code
(a) For the use of the State Guard, the Governor may submit requisitions to the United States Secretary of Defense for any arms and equipment in the possession of and excess to or not required by the Department of the Army or allotted or available to the State Guard. The Governor may provide arms and equipment to the State Guard that are not furnished by the Department of the Army and are required in the defense of the state. The Governor may make available to the State Guard armories and other state premises, property, supplies, and equipment as may be available.

(b) The members of the State Guard are members of the state militia for purposes of this code.

(c) All unexpended balances appropriated for the use of the California National Guard or the Adjutant General and not required by the California National Guard or the Adjutant General may be expended by the Adjutant General for the use and benefit of the State Guard and its members. Section 255 does not apply to the State Guard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 56.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

555.

Such forces shall not be required to serve outside the boundaries of this state except:

(a) Upon the request of the Governor of another state, the Governor of this state may, in their discretion, order any portion or all of such forces as may be then in actual service to assist the military or police forces of the other state who are actually engaged in defending the other state. These forces may be recalled by the Governor at their discretion.

(b) Any organization, unit, or detachment of forces upon order of the officer in immediate command thereof, may continue in fresh pursuit of insurrectionists, saboteurs, enemies, or enemy forces beyond the borders of this state into another state until they are apprehended or captured
 by such organization, unit, or detachment or until the military or police forces of the other state or the forces of the United States have had reasonable opportunity to take up the pursuit or to apprehend or capture such persons if the other state shall have given authority by law for the pursuit by such forces of this state. Any person who is apprehended or captured in another state by an organization, unit, or detachment of the forces of this state shall without unnecessary delay be surrendered to the military or police forces of the state in which they are taken or to the United States. This surrender shall not constitute a waiver by this state of its rights to extradite or prosecute the person for any crime committed in this state.

(c) Pursuant to the provisions of the National Defense Act of 1916, as amended, and such amendments as may be made thereto hereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 148.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

556.

Any military forces or organization, unit or detachment thereof, of another state who are in fresh pursuit of insurrectionists, saboteurs, enemies or enemy forces may continue such pursuit into this State until the military or police forces of this State or the forces of the United States have had a reasonable opportunity to take up the pursuit or to apprehend or capture such persons and are hereby authorized to arrest or capture such persons within this State while in fresh pursuit. Any such persons who shall be captured or arrested by the military forces of such other state while in this State shall without unnecessary delay be surrendered to the military or police forces of this State to be dealt with according to law. This section shall not be construed so as to make unlawful any arrest in this State which would otherwise be lawful, and nothing contained in this section shall be deemed to repeal any of the provisions of the Uniform Act of the Fresh Pursuit of Criminals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------

557.

(a) A person shall not, by reason of their enlistment or commission in any such forces, be exempted from military service under any law of the United States.

(b) Section 230 and Sections 232 to 237, inclusive, apply to commissioned officers. Section 225 applies to warrant officers. Sections 252, 253, 254, and 260, except subdivision (b) of Section 260, apply to enlisted personnel of the forces authorized herein. However, this code shall not prevent the transfer, by order of the Governor, at any time, of any member of those forces to a reserve list created in the office of the Commanding General of the State Military Forces.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 149.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

558.

No civil organization, society, club, post, order, fraternity, association, brotherhood, body, union, league, or other combination of persons or civil group shall be enlisted in such forces as an organization or unit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------

559.

(a) A person shall not be commissioned or enlisted in the State Guard if either of the following apply:

(1) The person is not a citizen of the United States or has not declared their intention to become a citizen of the United States.

(2) The person has been expelled or dishonorably discharged from a military or naval organization of this state, of another state, or of the United States.

(b) A person is not eligible to commission or enlist in the State Guard if they actively participate in any of the conduct set forth in
 subdivision (a) of Section 240.

(c) A person who is commissioned or enlisted in the State Guard shall be discharged under undesirable conditions if they actively participate in any of the conduct set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 240.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 774, Sec. 5.   (SB 901)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

560.

(a) The Uniform Code of Military Justice (Chapter 47 (commencing with Section 801) of Title 10 of the United States Code) and the rules and regulations adopted thereunder, together with the Manual for Courts-Martial, United States, 1984 (Executive Order No. 12473 of April 13, 1984, as amended), are hereby adopted as part of this code and shall be applicable to and govern the State Guard.

(b) An officer or enlisted person of the State Guard
 shall not be arrested on any warrant, except for treason or a felony, while going to, remaining at, or returning from a place the person is ordered to attend for military duty. Every officer and enlisted person of the State Guard, while on active military orders, is exempt from service upon any posse comitatus and from jury duty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 60.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

562.

In all cases in which any officer, warrant officer or enlisted person of the State Guard, when organized or authorized as a cadre or otherwise, when in the performance of ordered duty, or when ordered into the active service of the state, is wounded, injured, disabled, or killed in active service, or in the performance of ordered duty and in line of duty, the officer or warrant officer or enlisted person or the dependents of that officer or warrant officer or enlisted person shall be entitled to receive compensation from the state in accordance with the provisions of Division 4 (commencing with Section 3201) of the Labor Code. In all such
 cases, an officer, warrant officer, enlisted person shall be held and deemed to be an employee of the state. The compensation to be awarded to any such officer, warrant officer, enlisted person shall be ascertained, determined, and fixed upon the basis of the person’s average income from all sources during the year immediately preceding the date of the injury or death or the commencement of the disability, but the compensation shall in no case exceed the maximum prescribed in Division 4 (commencing with Section 3201) of the Labor Code.

In the determination of the benefits to be awarded any member of the
 State Guard or
 the member’s dependents under the provisions of this section it shall be conclusively presumed that the average yearly earning of the injured or deceased member is not less than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). Any injury, death, or disability shall be deemed to have been suffered in line of duty unless the same resulted from misconduct or disobedience of lawful orders by the injured or deceased member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 97, Sec. 33.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

563.

All members of said forces are hereby declared to be engaged in military service within the meaning of that term as used in Article XXIV of the Constitution of this State and are exempt from civil service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------

564.

All of the rights, privileges and benefits provided in Sections 394 and 395 of this code are hereby extended to members of said forces while in the active service of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------

565.

This chapter may be cited as the State Military Reserve Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

566.

Sections 9, 16, 141, 176, 188, 230, 361, 366, 389, 395.1, 395.01, 395.2, 395.02, 395.3, 395.03, 395.4, 395.5, 395.05, 395.06, 395.8, 411, 421, 423, 439, 612, 640, 641, 642, 643, 643.1, 644, 645, 646, 647, 648, and 649 apply to, and include, the forces authorized herein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

567.

This chapter shall take effect on the day following the day on which the National Guard or any part thereof is in federal service or on the day following the day on which Congress consents to the organization and maintenance of said forces, whichever event first occurs shall be the effective date hereof, and shall be effective forthwith upon approval by the Governor with respect to the authority granted in this act to the Governor to organize and maintain said forces at cadre strength at any time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 756.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 3. EMBLEMS AND DECORATIONS [611. - 649.]



CHAPTER 1. Emblems [611. - 617.]

611.

(a) “Flag,” as used in this division, means the State Flag of California and the Flag of the United States, as defined in this section.

(b) “State Flag of California” includes any flag, standard, color, or ensign authorized by the laws of this state, and every picture or representation thereof, of any size, made of any substance, or represented on any substance evidently purporting to be any such flag, standard, color, or ensign of this state, and every picture or representation which shows the design thereof.

(c) “Flag of the United States” includes any flag, standard, colors, or ensign authorized by the laws of the United States or any picture or representation of either, or of any part or parts of either, made of any substance or represented on any substance, of any size evidently purporting to be either of said flag, standard, colors, or ensign of the United States of America, or a picture or a representation of either, upon which shall be shown the colors, the stars and the stripes, in any number of either thereof, or of any part or parts of either, by which the average person seeing the same without deliberation may believe the same to represent the flag, standards, colors, or ensign of the United States of America.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

612.

(a) The colors and standards carried by organizations of the National Guard or Naval Militia shall be those which are carried by similar organizations of the United States Army, Air Force, or Navy, except that the regimental or battalion colors or standards may show the state coat of arms, instead of the coat of arms of the United States.

(b) The Adjutant General may, pursuant to rules and regulations adopted for the purpose, deliver to the members of the family of a deceased member of the National Guard or of the State Guard
 the colors used during the disposition of the remains of the deceased member according to the custom and usual practice of the United States Army, Air Force, or Navy, which then become the property of the members of the family.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 97, Sec. 34.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

613.

No military organization provided for by the Constitution and laws of this State and receiving State support shall, while under arms, either for ceremony or duty, carry any device, banner or flag of any State or Nation except that of the United States or of this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

614.

A person is guilty of a misdemeanor who knowingly casts contempt upon any Flag of the United States or of this state by publicly mutilating, defacing, defiling, burning, or trampling upon it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

615.

No provision of this code or of any law of this State which makes unlawful the use of the flag of the United States or of this State or of any picture or representation thereof shall apply to any act permitted by the statutes of the United States or of this State or by any regulations of the United States Army, or United States Air Force, or United States Navy, nor shall it be contrued to apply to any newspaper, periodical, book, pamphlet, circular, certificate, diploma, warrant or commission of appointment to office, ornamental picture, article of jewelry, or stationery for use in correspondence, on which is printed, painted, or placed a flag with no design or writing thereon and not connected with any advertisement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 536.)
-------------------------------------------

616.

Any person who displays a red flag, banner, or badge or any flag, badge, banner, or device of any color or form whatever in any public place or in any meeting place or public assembly, or from or on any house, building, or window as a sign, symbol, or emblem of forceful or violent opposition to organized government or as an invitation or stimulus to anarchistic action or as aid to propaganda that advocates by force or violence the overthrow of government is guilty of a felony.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

617.

No other flag or pennant shall be placed above, or if on the same level, to the right of the Flag of the United States of America, except during church services, when the church flag may be flown.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 551.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Military Rewards and Decorations [640. - 649.]

640.

The following decorations are authorized for members of the National Guard, State Guard, and Naval Militia:

(a) Medal of Valor.

(b) Military Cross.

(c) Order of California.

(d) Memorial
 Medal.

(e) Medal of Merit.

(f) Commendation Medal.

(g) Service Medal.

(h) Good Conduct Medal.

The Order of California, Medal of Merit, and Commendation Medal are also authorized for award to civilians and members of other military services who bring honor to the State of California by their actions.

The Adjutant General may provide and procure appropriate emblematic devices for each decoration, together with suitable ribbons and insignia to be worn with or in place of the medal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 97, Sec. 35.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

641.

(a) A Medal of Valor may be presented to each person who, while an officer or enlisted member of the National Guard or Naval Militia, distinguishes themself by courageous conduct at the risk of life, above and beyond the call of duty while in the service of the state or of the United States.

(b) An award of the Medal of Valor shall not be made except upon
 clear and incontestable proof by affidavit of at least one eyewitness or person having personal knowledge of the act or deed.

(c) A Medal of Valor may be presented to each person who has been awarded the Congressional Medal of Honor, and proof by affidavit or otherwise of the act or deed shall not be required in those cases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 61.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

642.

A Military Cross may be presented to each person who, while an officer or enlisted member of the National Guard or Naval Militia, distinguishes themself by extraordinary heroism while in the service of the state or of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 62.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

642.1.

(a) The Order of California may be presented to an officer or enlisted member of the National Guard or Naval Militia who has distinguished themself by exceptionally meritorious conduct in the performance of outstanding service to the state or the United States in a position of great responsibility. The performance of duty shall have been such as to merit recognition of service rendered in a clearly exceptional manner
 within the scope of a special requirement or of an extremely difficult duty performed in a clearly outstanding manner. Performance of duties normal to the grade and branch, specialty or assignment, and experience of an individual is not an adequate basis for this decoration, except that justification of the award may accrue by virtue of outstanding meritorious service in a succession of important positions.

(b) The accomplishment of the duty or period of service for which the decoration is recommended should have been completed prior to submitting a recommendation. However, if the person being recommended is transferred or will retire prior to completion, the action or accomplishment shall have reached a point of progression that will clearly establish the individual’s contribution to be outstanding or represent significant accomplishment.

(c) The Order of California may also be
 awarded to civilians and members of other military services who distinguish themselves as indicated in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 63.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

642.5.

A Memorial Medal may be presented posthumously to any person who, while an officer, warrant officer, or enlisted member of the National Guard, the State Guard, or the Naval Militia is killed in the service of the state or the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 97, Sec. 36.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

643.

(a) A Medal of Merit may be presented to each person who, while an officer, warrant officer, or enlisted member of the National Guard or Naval Militia, distinguishes themself by exceptionally meritorious service to the state or the United States in a duty of great responsibility or to any person who, by unselfish and untiring activities in connection with the National Guard or Naval Militia, has rendered a distinct service
 in furthering the interests of and in promoting the security and welfare of the state.

(b) The Medal of Merit may also be awarded to civilians and members of other military services who distinguish themselves as indicated in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 64.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

643.1.

A Commendation Medal may be presented to each person who, while an officer, warrant officer, or enlisted member of the National Guard, State Guard, or Naval Militia distinguishes themselves while serving in any capacity with the National Guard, State Guard, or Naval Militia by meritorious achievement or meritorious service. The meritorious achievement or meritorious service is less exceptional than that required for the Medal of Merit but
 shall be accomplished with distinction.

The Commendation Medal may also be awarded to civilians and members of other military services who distinguish themselves as indicated in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 97, Sec. 37.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

643.2.

A good conduct medal may be presented to each person who, while an enlisted member of the California National Guard, State Guard, or Naval Militia, has demonstrated fidelity through faithful and exact performance of duty, efficiency through capacity to produce desired results, and whose behavior has demonstrated that the person deserves emulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 97, Sec. 38.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

643.3.

A State Service Ribbon may be presented by the Adjutant General to each person who after July 1, 1963, honorably serves on active duty with the State during a period of emergency declared by the Governor or while the United States is engaged in war as defined in Section 18 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 362.)
-------------------------------------------

644.

A service medal or bar shall be issued for 10 years’ service in the California National Guard, the California Air National Guard, the Naval Militia, or the State Guard, and for each period of five years of service thereafter. Such medal or bar shall be issued to those entitled to the same upon application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 97, Sec. 39.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

644.1.

A Federal Service Ribbon may be presented by the Adjutant General to each person inducted into the federal service as a member of a California National Guard unit after September 15, 1940, and who has completed not less than a total of 12 months honorable service in the armed forces of the United States between September 15, 1940, and September 16, 1945, and to each person inducted into the federal service as a member of a California National Guard unit after August 1, 1950, and who has completed not less than a total of 12 months honorable service in the armed forces of the United States while the United States is engaged in war as defined in Section 18 of this code and to each person inducted into the federal
 service as a member of a California National Guard unit on or after October 1, 1961, and who has completed not less than a total of three months honorable service in the armed forces of the United States between October 1, 1961, and August 31, 1962.

The Federal Service Ribbon shall be prepared, designed, awarded and issued according to rules and regulations to be adopted by the Adjutant General and all applications therefor shall be in writing and filed in the office of the Adjutant General. The applicant shall have the burden of proof as to his military service and the decision of the Adjutant General, in case of dispute, shall be final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 361.)
-------------------------------------------

645.

The Medal of Valor shall be presented by the Governor. The Military Cross, the Medal of Merit, the Service Medal, and other authorized medals and awards shall be presented by the Governor or The Adjutant General in the name of the Governor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

646.

No more than one Medal of Valor, or one Military Cross, or one Medal of Merit shall be issued to any one person; but for each succeeding deed or act sufficient to justify the award of a Medal of Valor, or a Military Cross, or a Medal of Merit, a suitable bar or other device denoting such additional award may be issued and worn as directed by appropriate regulations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

647.

The Adjutant General may hold and conduct competitions and competitive military exercises, may procure and issue appropriate ribbons, badges, or insignia in connection therewith and for excellence in marksmanship, for drill attendance, and for competitive military training, and may authorize participation in national or state military or civil marksmanship competitions. All expenses in relation thereto shall be paid from state funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 566, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

648.

(a) Except as provided by subdivision (b), decorations authorized by this code and decorations, medals, badges, ribbons, and insignia authorized by the laws or regulations of the United States pertaining to the National Guard, Air National Guard, and Naval Militia may be worn by officers, warrant officers, and enlisted persons in accordance with the code, laws, or regulations. However, decorations awarded by other states
 and territories of the United States may be worn, but shall be subordinated to those issued by federal and state laws or regulations. No other decorations, medals, badges, ribbons, or insignia may be worn. A violation of this section shall constitute a misdemeanor.

(b) Decorations authorized by this code and decorations or medals from the Armed Forces of the United States, the California National Guard, State Guard, or Naval Militia, or any service medals or badges awarded to the members of such forces, may be worn by uniformed public safety personnel in accordance with the code, laws, or regulations, during the business week prior to Veterans Day and Memorial Day, the day of Veterans Day and Memorial Day, and the business day immediately following Veterans Day and Memorial Day. The employer of the uniformed public safety personnel shall retain the right to prohibit the wearing of military decorations pursuant to this subdivision if the
 employer determines that wearing the military decorations poses a safety hazard to the uniformed public safety personnel or to the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 97, Sec. 40.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

649.

(a) The Adjutant General may adopt, from time to time, any rules, regulations, and orders not inconsistent with this code which the Adjutant General deems necessary to carry into effect this chapter.

(b) The Adjutant General may present duplicate medals or ribbons or other decorations authorized by this code to the next of kin of any deceased member of the
 National Guard, if the original decorations are inadvertently lost or destroyed.

(c) Furthermore, the Adjutant General may establish additional awards and decorations as may be necessary to properly recognize the service or achievement of members of the National Guard, State Guard, and Naval Militia.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 97, Sec. 41.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 4. VETERANS' AID AND WELFARE [690. - 1008.5.]



CHAPTER 1. Department of Veterans Affairs [690. - 715.]

690.

As used in this division, “department” means the Department of Veterans Affairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 328.)
-------------------------------------------

694.

The department constitutes a public corporation and may on behalf of the State hold property, request and receive donations, contract, sue and be sued, and has all other rights and powers provided by the Constitution and laws of the State as belonging to public corporations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 328.)
-------------------------------------------

695.

The department may cooperate and contract with the duly authorized representative of the United States Government in carrying out the provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 328.)
-------------------------------------------

699.

All State and county officials shall furnish all required information to the department, upon request, and shall further assist the department in any manner in accordance with law and without charge therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 328.)
-------------------------------------------

699.1.

(a) The processing of claims for veterans and their dependents and survivors shall include the filing of the initial claim, the representation of the claimant before boards and offices of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, and the filing of appeals related to the claims.

(b) The claims may include the following types of benefits and services:

(1) Disability compensation benefits.

(2) Disability pension benefits.

(3) Dependents’ indemnity compensation.

(4) Widow’s death pension.

(5) Burial benefits.

(6) Confirmed and continued claims.

(7) Vocational rehabilitation and education.

(8) Waivers of indebtedness.

(9) Other benefits that result in monetary awards to the claimant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 804, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

699.5.

(a) The department may assist every veteran of the United States and the dependent or survivor of every veteran of the United States in presenting and pursuing the claim as the veteran, dependent, or survivor may have against the United States arising out of military service and in establishing the veteran’s, dependent’s, or survivor’s right to any privilege, preference, care, or compensation provided for by
 the laws of the United States or of this state. The department may cooperate and, with the approval of the Department of Finance, contract with any veterans service organization, and pursuant to the contract may compensate the organization for services within the scope of this section rendered by it to any veteran or dependent or survivor of a veteran. The contract shall not be made unless the department determines that, owing to the confidential relationships involved and the necessity of operating through agencies that the veterans, dependents, or survivors involved will feel to be sympathetic toward their problems, the services cannot satisfactorily be rendered otherwise than through the agency of the veterans organization and that the best interests of the veterans, dependents, or survivors involved will be served if the contract is made.

(b) (1) The Legislature finds and declares that services provided by veterans
 service organizations play an important role in the department’s responsibilities to assist veterans and their dependents and survivors in presenting and pursuing claims against the United States, and that it is an efficient and reasonable use of state funds to provide compensation to veterans service organizations for these services.

(2) The Legislature further finds and declares that paragraph (1) shall not be implemented by using the General Fund until the annual budget for county veterans service officers reaches a minimum of five million dollars ($5,000,000). This subdivision shall not be construed to preclude the use of federal funding in implementing these provisions.

(c) Veterans service organizations that elect to contract with the department in accordance with this section shall document the claims processed each year by the veterans service officers employed by the
 veterans service organization at offices located in California. The documentation shall be in accordance with procedures established by the department.

(d) The department shall determine annually the amount of monetary benefits paid to eligible veterans and their dependents and survivors in the state as a result of the work of the veterans service officers of the contracting organizations. Beginning on January 1, 2006, the department shall, on or before January 1 of each year, prepare and transmit its determination for the preceding fiscal year to the Department of Finance and the Legislature. The department shall also identify federal sources to support the efforts of veterans service organizations pursuant to this section. The Department of Finance shall review the department’s determination in time to use the information in the annual Budget Act for the budget of the department for the next fiscal year.

(e) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Survivor” means any relation of a deceased veteran who may be entitled to make a claim for any privilege, preference, care, or compensation under the laws of the United States or this state based upon the veteran’s war service.

(2) “Veterans service officer” means an individual employed by a veterans service organization and accredited by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs to process and adjudicate claims and other benefits for veterans and their dependents and survivors.

(3) “Veterans service organization” means an organization that meets all of the following criteria:

(A) Is formed by and for United States military veterans.

(B) Is chartered by the United States Congress.

(C) Has regularly maintained an established committee or agency in a regional office of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs in California rendering services to veterans and their dependents and survivors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 186, Sec. 1.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

700.

The department may make rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 328.)
-------------------------------------------

701.

In the event that the provisions of the Servicemen’s Readjustment Act of 1944 are amended in such manner as to make the guarantees by the United States of loans to veterans for farms and homes applicable to purchases of farms and homes from the Department of Veterans Affairs pursuant to Chapter 3 and Article 3 of Chapter 6, the State of California hereby accepts the benefits of such federal act, and agrees to comply with all the requirements of said act.

The Department of Veterans Affairs is hereby designated as the official agency of the State to apply to the United States for such guarantees and to do all acts required in connection
 therewith. The board is authorized to adopt such rules and regulations and standards as may be required by the federal act and are not in conflict with the provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 86.)
-------------------------------------------

702.

All salaries and expenses of the Division of Farm and Home Purchases shall be paid out of the Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943 and no part thereof shall be paid from the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 484.)
-------------------------------------------

710.

(a) The Department of Veterans Affairs may establish a pilot project for the purpose of establishing a cooperative housing project.

(b) The Department of Veterans Affairs shall work in conjunction with the Department of Housing and Community Development to implement the pilot project.

(c) The Department of Veterans Affairs may use existing
 home loan funds to establish the pilot project. These funds shall be used in accordance with all laws and regulations governing the use of the funds. 

(d) The Department of Veterans Affairs shall prescribe the rules, regulations, and conditions necessary to implement this section.

(e) Any cooperative housing project established pursuant to this section shall be restricted for use and occupancy by military veterans and their families for a period of at least 55 years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 524, Sec. 1.   (AB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

711.

(a) The department shall publicize information pertaining to benefit programs that are available to qualified homeless veterans, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The veterans pension programs administered by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs (38 U.S.C. Sec. 1501 et seq.), especially the eligibility for those veterans who are 65 years of age or older or are permanently
 and totally disabled. 

(2) The Veterans Affairs Supportive Housing voucher program (Public Law 110-161), and any programs that assist homeless veterans in securing rental housing with that information including, to the extent possible, the information that veterans not eligible for loans under the Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1974, and subsequent acts, may be eligible for housing assistance under the Veterans Affairs Supportive Housing voucher program.

(3) CalFresh (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code).

(b) The department shall publicize this information using any of the following methods:

(1) Printed material, including, but not limited to, flyers and posters, with the
 information that can be provided to county veterans service offices, homeless shelters, Veterans Affairs hospitals, and other public and private entities that come into contact with homeless veterans.

(2) On the department’s Internet Web site.

(3) Any other method that the department determines would publicize and create awareness to homeless veterans about the benefit programs available to them.

(c) The information shall also state that veterans may receive assistance from a county veterans service office in applying for any benefits that they may be qualified to receive.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 408, Sec. 1.   (SB 1198)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

711.1.

(a) If the federal government acts to reinstate benefits to discharged veterans, regardless of their discharge classification, who were denied those benefits solely on the basis of sexual orientation pursuant to any federal policy prohibiting homosexual personnel from serving in the Armed Forces of the United States, the state shall reinstate to those veterans any state-offered benefits they were denied due to those federal policies.

(b) To the extent practicable, the department shall do the following:

(1) On the department’s Internet Web site, provide Internet resources or links to Internet resources that provide information regarding veterans’ legal services organizations that specialize in military discharge upgrades.

(2) In the department’s offices and walk-in locations, provide printed resources, to the extent available, created by veterans’ legal services organizations that specialize in military discharge upgrades.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 397, Sec. 2.   (AB 1505)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

712.

The department shall do both of the following:

(a) Make available to family members of veterans returning from active duty both of the following:

 (1) (A) User-friendly Internet resources that provide information on the signs of pertinent ailments from various conflicts, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) From the Vietnam War, exposure to Agent Orange and post-traumatic stress disorder.

(ii) From Operation Desert Shield and Operation Desert Storm, exposure to depleted uranium and Gulf War Syndrome.

(iii) From Operation Enduring Freedom and Operation Iraqi Freedom, traumatic brain injury and post-traumatic stress disorder.
